Indiana, session 2026, HB1137.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
1 SECTION 1. IC 20-26-9-20 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
2 AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
3 1, 2026]: Sec. 20. (a) This section does not apply to the following:
4 (1) Vending machines on school property that are not
5 accessible by students.
6 (2) Events on school property that occur on the weekend.
7 (b) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year and except as
8 provided under subsection (c), a public school, including a charter
9 school, that participates in a federally funded or assisted meal
10 program:
11 (1) shall post on the school's website the school's breakfast
12 and lunch menu, as applicable, with the list of ingredients for
13 each item on the menu; and
14 (2) may not serve, sell, or allow a third party vendor to serve
15 or sell a food or beverage on school property on a school day
16 that contains one (1) or more of the following ingredients:
17 (A) Potassium bromate (CAS 7758-01-02).
HB 1137—LS 6622/DI 110

2
1 (B) Propylparaben (CAS 94-13-3).
2 (C) Titanium dioxide (CAS 13463-67-7).
3 (D) Yellow dye 5 (CAS 1934-21-0).
4 (E) Yellow dye 6 (CAS 2783-94-0).
5 (F) Blue dye 1 (CAS 3844-45-9).
6 (G) Blue dye 2 (CAS 860-22-0).
7 (H) Green dye 3 (CAS 2353-45-9).
8 (I) Red dye 3 (CAS 16423-68-0).
9 (J) Red dye 40 (CAS 25956-17-6).
10 (K) Butylated hydroxytoluene (BHT) (CAS 128-37-0).
11 (L) Tert-butylhydroquinone (TBHQ) (CAS 1948-33-0).
12 (M) Azodicarbonamide (CAS 123-77-3).
13 (c) A school described in subsection (b) may sell or permit the
14 sale of a food or beverage that contains an ingredient listed in
15 subsection (b)(2) on school property as part of a fundraising event
16 if the sale of the food or beverage occurs at least thirty (30) minutes
17 after the end of the school day.
18 (d) This section does not prohibit the parent of a student from
19 providing a food or beverage that contains an ingredient listed in
20 subsection (b)(2) to the student on a school day.
HB 1137—LS 6622/DI 110

3
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Education, to which was referred
House Bill 1137, has had the same under consideration and begs leave
to report the same back to the House with the recommendation that said
bill be amended as follows:
Page 1, delete lines 1 through 17, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 1. IC 20-26-9-20 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 20. (a) This section does not apply to the following:
(1) Vending machines on school property that are not
accessible by students.
(2) Events on school property that occur on the weekend.
(b) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year and except as
provided under subsection (c), a public school, including a charter
school, that participates in a federally funded or assisted meal
program:
(1) shall post on the school's website the school's breakfast
and lunch menu, as applicable, with the list of ingredients for
each item on the menu; and
(2) may not serve, sell, or allow a third party vendor to serve
or sell a food or beverage on school property on a school day
that contains one (1) or more of the following ingredients:
(A) Potassium bromate (CAS 7758-01-02).
(B) Propylparaben (CAS 94-13-3).
(C) Titanium dioxide (CAS 13463-67-7).
(D) Yellow dye 5 (CAS 1934-21-0).
(E) Yellow dye 6 (CAS 2783-94-0).
(F) Blue dye 1 (CAS 3844-45-9).
(G) Blue dye 2 (CAS 860-22-0).
(H) Green dye 3 (CAS 2353-45-9).
(I) Red dye 3 (CAS 16423-68-0).
(J) Red dye 40 (CAS 25956-17-6).
(K) Butylated hydroxytoluene (BHT) (CAS 128-37-0).
(L) Tert-butylhydroquinone (TBHQ) (CAS 1948-33-0).
(M) Azodicarbonamide (CAS 123-77-3).".
Page 2, delete lines 1 through 11.
Page 2, line 13, delete "an ultraprocessed food or beverage" and
insert "a food or beverage that contains an ingredient listed in
subsection (b)(2)".
Page 2, line 14, delete "ultraprocessed".
Page 2, line 18, delete "an ultraprocessed food or beverage" and
insert "a food or beverage that contains an ingredient listed in
HB 1137—LS 6622/DI 110

4
subsection (b)(2)".
Page 2, line 18, delete "during" and insert "on a".
Page 2, line 19, delete "the".
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1137 as introduced.)
BEHNING
Committee Vote: yeas 11, nays 0.
HB 1137—LS 6622/DI 110